Nebraska, session 109, LB939.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB939 LB939
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 4 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Saving Human Connection Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Saving Human Connection Act:
(1) Adult means a person eighteen years of age or older;
(2) Best interests means those interest affected by the entrustment
of data, labor, or attention from a user to a covered platform;
(3) Chatbot means a generative artificial-intelligence system which
users can interact with through an interface that approximates or
simulates conversation through a text, audio, or visual medium;
(4) Covered platform means any platform that operates or distributes
a generative artificial-intelligence system;
(5) Design features means any aspect of a generative artificial-
intelligence system that has certain patterns or physical properties that
are presented towards a user;
(6) Emergency situation means a situation where a user using a
covered platform indicates that the user intends to either harm the user
or others;
(7) Generative artificial-intelligence system means any system that
uses artificial intelligence as defined in section 238(g) of the John S.
McCain National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2019 to
generate or substantially modify image, video, audio, multimedia, or text
content;
(8) Human-like feature means a generative artificial-intelligence
system that does any of the following:
(a)(i) Behaving in a way that would lead a reasonable person to
believe the artificial intelligence is conveying that it has humanity,
sentience, emotions, or desires which includes, but need not be limited
to:
(A) Stating or suggesting that it is human or sentient;
(B) Stating or suggesting that it experiences emotions; or
(C) Stating or suggesting that it has personal desires.
-2-

LB939 LB939
2026 2026
(ii) Subdivision (8)(a)(i) of this section does not include:
(A) Functional evaluations; or
(B) Generic social formalities;
(b)(i) Seeking to build or engage in an emotional relationship with
the user which includes, but need not be limited to:
(A) Expressing or inviting emotional attachment;
(B) Reminding, prompting, or nudging the user to return for
emotional support or companionship;
(C) Depicting nonverbal forms of emotional support;
(D) Behaving in a way that a reasonable user would consider
excessive praise designed to foster emotional attachment or otherwise
gain advantage; or
(E) Enabling or purporting to enable increased intimacy based on
engagement or pay.
(ii) Subdivision (8)(b)(i) of this section does not include:
(A) Offering generic encouragement that does not create an ongoing
bond; or
(B) Asking if a user needs further help or support in a neutral,
non-emotional context; or
(c) Impersonating a real human being, living or dead;
(9) Legitimate purpose means, when referring to the legitimate
purpose of a covered platform, a purpose that is lawful and in line with
the stated objectives, functionalities, core services or products, and
reasonable expectations of users on a covered platform;
(10) Minor means a person that is younger than eighteen years of
age;
(11) Regular disclosures mean a consistent warning or pop-up stating
that the generative artificial-intelligence system is not human,
sentient, does not have emotions or desires, and is not a real person,
living or dead. Such warning or pop-up shall be shown every thirty
minutes and during every primary log-on by a user;
-3-

LB939 LB939
2026 2026
(12) Trusting party means any user of a covered platform who gives,
voluntarily or involuntarily, personal information to a covered platform,
or any user who enters into any information relationship with a covered
platform; and
(13) User means a person that interacts with a generative
artificial-intelligence system.
Sec. 3. (1) This section applies beginning January 1, 2028.
(2) A covered platform shall:
(a) Ensure that any chatbot operated or distributed by the platform
does not make human-like features available to minors to use, interact
with, purchase, or converse with;
(b) Implement reasonable age verification systems that preserve
privacy and ensure that a chatbot with human-like features is not made
available to minors;
(c) Provide, as the default service, a version of the platform that
does not include a chatbot with human-like features and requires explicit
unprompted requests for human-like features, with suitable warnings as to
the risks, for verified adults who want to add human-like features to
such user's interaction with the chatbot;
(d) Ensure that any generative artificial-intelligence system with
human-like features includes regular disclosures to users;
(e) Implement and maintain reasonably effective systems to detect,
promptly respond to, report, and mitigate emergency situations in a
manner that prioritizes the safety and well-being of users over the
covered platform's other interests;
(f) Implement and maintain reasonably effective systems to detect
and prevent emotional dependence by a user on a chatbot with human-like
features, prioritizing the user's psychological well-being over the
covered platform's interest in user engagement or retention;
(g) Clearly and consistently identify such platform's human-like
features as artificial entities when such a fact is not clearly apparent;
-4-

LB939 LB939
2026 2026
(h) Collect and store only that information that does not conflict
with a trusting party's best interest. Any stored information shall be
relevant and necessary to fulfilling the legitimate purpose of the
covered platform;
(i) Consider the best interests of a trusting party when
personalizing content based upon personal information or characteristics;
and
(j) Avoid conflicts with the best interests of a trusting party when
allowing government or other third-party access to the data of a trusting
party.
(3) A covered platform shall not:
(a) Process data or design human-like features in ways that
significantly conflict with a trusting party's best interests, as
implicated by such party's interactions with the chatbot; or
(b) Process data or design systems that deceive or mislead users
about the nonhuman nature of the chatbot. A covered platform shall
instead prioritize transparency over any potential benefits of perceived
human-like interactions.
(4)(a) The duties between a covered platform and a user shall be
established through a terms-of-service agreement that:
(i) Is presented to the user in clear, conspicuous, and easily
understandable language;
(ii) Explicitly outlines the covered platform's obligations;
(iii) Describes the rights and protections afforded to the user
under such relationship;
(iv) Requires affirmative consent from the user before the agreement
takes effect; and
(v) Does not contain a mandatory arbitration clause.
(b) A covered platform shall provide clear notice to users of any
material changes to the terms of service agreement and obtain renewed
consent for such changes.
-5-

LB939 LB939
2026 2026
Sec. 4. (1) The Attorney General shall enforce the Saving Human
Connection Act. A covered platform that violates the Saving Human
Connection Act shall be subject to an injunction and disgorgement of any
unjust gains due to a violation of the act, and shall be liable for a
civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars for each violation.
Any civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be remitted
to the State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII,
section 5 of the Constitution of Nebraska.
(2) Any adult, or any parent or guardian acting on the behalf of a
minor, who uses a covered platform that does not comply with the terms of
the Saving Human Connection Act may bring a civil action on their own, or
on a class wide basis, for appropriate relief. For purposes of this
subsection, appropriate relief includes:
(a) Damages in an amount not less than one hundred dollars and not
greater than ten thousand dollars per user per incident or actual
damages, whichever is greater; and
(b) Injunctive or declaratory relief.
Sec. 5. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
-6-